Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-904
American Sign Language course; credits; how used.

Any postsecondary educational institution may offer an elective course in American Sign Language. Any credits earned in a course in American Sign Language at a postsecondary educational institution may be used for world language credits if recognized as such by the postsecondary educational institution.

Laws 2020, LB965, § 3.